test/src/morphology/N-naniway_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - naniway - ok : # -m animate noun
     naniway+N+AN+Sg: naniway
     naniway+N+AN+Pl: [naniwayak, naniwaywak]
     naniway+N+AN+Sg+Loc: naniwayihk
     naniway+N+AN+Pl+Loc: [naniwayakihk, naniwaywakwihk]
     naniway+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: ninaniway
     naniway+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kinaniway
     naniway+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg: naniway
     naniway+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: ninaniwaynân
     naniway+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: ninaniwaynân
     naniway+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kinaniwaywâw
     naniway+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl: naniwaywâw
